Utah statutes.
72-4-204.   Dinosaur Diamond Prehistoric Highway.

(1)  There is established the Dinosaur Diamond Prehistoric Highway comprising the existing highways beginning on Route 191 in Blanding north to the frontage road of Route 70 at Crescent Junction, then west on the frontage road of Route 70 to Green River, then northerly on Route 191 and Route 6 to Route 10 near Price, then:

(a)  south on Route 10 to Castle Dale, then North on Route 10 to Route 155, then south on Route 155 to the Cleveland Lloyd Dinosaur Quarry via its access road; and

(b)  northerly on Route 191 and Route 6 to Helper and the State of Utah Indian Canyon Scenic Byway, then northeasterly on Route 191 to Route 40 in Duchesne, then east on Route 40 and Route 191 to Vernal, and then east on Route 40 to Route 149, then northeasterly on Route 149 to the Dinosaur National Monument, then southwesterly on Route 149 to Route 40, then east on Route 40 to the Utah and Colorado state boundary line.

(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate and highlight the portions of the highways identified in Subsection (1) as the Dinosaur Diamond Prehistoric Highway on all future state highway maps.

